Indiana, session 2026, HB1136.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-18-9-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. For purposes of:
(1) IC 21-27-3-6;
(2) IC 21-27-4-5;
(3) IC 21-27-5-5;
(4) IC 21-27-7-7; and
(5) IC 21-27-8-8;
the commission shall determine a tuition rate and mandatory fee
cost of living adjustment based on the Consumer Price Index as
prepared by the United States Department of Labor.
SECTION 2. IC 21-27-3-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) For purposes of this section, an undergraduate
student includes a student enrolled in:
(1) a bachelor's degree program; or
(2) any degree program or specialized degree program that is
2026 IN 1136—LS 6590/DI 143


attainable by a student who has completed undergraduate
work prior to admission into the degree program or
specialized degree program but is not required to obtain an
associate or bachelor's degree in order to enroll in the degree
program or specialized degree program.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) and subject to
subsection (c), the tuition rate and mandatory fees charged by Ball
State University for an undergraduate student who is an Indiana
resident may not increase from the tuition rate and mandatory fees
charged by Ball State University at the time the student initially
enrolled at Ball State University.
(c) To qualify under subsection (b), the undergraduate student
must remain enrolled in Ball State University.
(d) Tuition rates and mandatory fees charged by Ball State
University under subsection (b) may be increased as a result of a
cost of living adjustment as determined by the commission under
IC 21-18-9-12.
SECTION 3. IC 21-27-4-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) For purposes of this section, an undergraduate
student includes a student enrolled in:
(1) a bachelor's degree program; or
(2) any degree program or specialized degree program that is
attainable by a student who has completed undergraduate
work prior to admission into the degree program or
specialized degree program but is not required to obtain an
associate or bachelor's degree in order to enroll in the degree
program or specialized degree program.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) and subject to
subsection (c), the tuition rate and mandatory fees charged by
Indiana University for an undergraduate student who is an Indiana
resident may not increase from the tuition rate and mandatory fees
charged by Indiana University at the time the student initially
enrolled at Indiana University.
(c) To qualify under subsection (b), the undergraduate student
must remain enrolled in Indiana University.
(d) Tuition rates and mandatory fees charged by Indiana
University under subsection (b) may be increased as a result of a
cost of living adjustment as determined by the commission under
IC 21-18-9-12.
SECTION 4. IC 21-27-5-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
2026 IN 1136—LS 6590/DI 143


1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) For purposes of this section, an undergraduate
student includes a student enrolled in:
(1) a bachelor's degree program; or
(2) any degree program or specialized degree program that is
attainable by a student who has completed undergraduate
work prior to admission into the degree program or
specialized degree program but is not required to obtain an
associate or bachelor's degree in order to enroll in the degree
program or specialized degree program.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (d) and subject to
subsection (c), the tuition rate and mandatory fees charged by
Indiana State University for an undergraduate student who is an
Indiana resident may not increase from the tuition rate and
mandatory fees charged by Indiana State University at the time the
student initially enrolled at Indiana State University.
(c) To qualify under subsection (b), the undergraduate student
must remain enrolled in Indiana State University.
(d) Tuition rates and mandatory fees charged by Indiana State
University under subsection (b) may be increased as a result of a
cost of living adjustment as determined by the commission under
IC 21-18-9-12.
SECTION 5. IC 21-27-7-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) For purposes of this section, an undergraduate
student includes a student enrolled in:
(1) a bachelor's degree program; or
(2) any degree program or specialized degree program that is
attainable by a student who has completed undergraduate
work prior to admission into the degree program or
specialized degree program but is not required to obtain an
associate or bachelor's degree in order to enroll in the degree
program or specialized degree program.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (d) and subject to
subsection (c), the tuition rate and mandatory fees charged by
Purdue University for an undergraduate student who is an Indiana
resident may not increase from the tuition rate and mandatory fees
charged by Purdue University at the time the student initially
enrolled at Purdue University.
(c) To qualify under subsection (b), the undergraduate student
must remain enrolled in Purdue University.
(d) Tuition rates and mandatory fees charged by Purdue
University under subsection (b) may be increased as a result of a
2026 IN 1136—LS 6590/DI 143


cost of living adjustment as determined by the commission under
IC 21-18-9-12.
SECTION 6. IC 21-27-8-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) For purposes of this section, an undergraduate
student includes a student enrolled in:
(1) a bachelor's degree program; or
(2) any degree program or specialized degree program that is
attainable by a student who has completed undergraduate
work prior to admission into the degree program or
specialized degree program but is not required to obtain an
associate or bachelor's degree in order to enroll in the degree
program or specialized degree program.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (d) and subject to
subsection (c), the tuition rate and mandatory fees charged by the
University of Southern Indiana for an undergraduate student who
is an Indiana resident may not increase from the tuition rate and
mandatory fees charged by the University of Southern Indiana at
the time the student initially enrolled at the University of Southern
Indiana.
(c) To qualify under subsection (b), the undergraduate student
must remain enrolled in the University of Southern Indiana.
(d) Tuition rates and mandatory fees charged by the University
of Southern Indiana under subsection (b) may be increased as a
result of a cost of living adjustment as determined by the
commission under IC 21-18-9-12.
2026 IN 1136—LS 6590/DI 143